Illinois, session 104th, HB4008.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5adding Section 356z.80 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/356z.80 new)7    Sec. 356z.80. Cost sharing; prescription rebates. 8    (a) A group or individual policy of accident and health 9insurance amended, delivered, issued, or renewed on or after 10January 1, 2026 that provides coverage for prescription drugs 11shall require that a covered individual's defined cost sharing 12for each prescription drug shall be calculated at the point of 13sale based on a price that is reduced by an amount equal to at 14least 100% of all rebates received in connection with the 15dispensation or administration of the prescription drug.16    (b) An insurer shall apply any rebate amount in excess of 17the defined cost sharing amount to the health plan to reduce 18premiums.19    (c) Nothing in this Section shall preclude an insurer from 20decreasing a covered individual's defined cost sharing by an 21amount greater than the stated amount at the point of sale.22    (d) The Department may adopt rules to implement this 23Section.